South Dakota, session 2026, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-22A:
Terms used in this Act mean:
(1) "Assisted reproduction procedure," a method of causing pregnancy, other than
through sexual intercourse, including in vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos,
intracytoplasmic sperm injection, and intracervical or intrauterine insemination;
(2) "Donor," an individual who donates reproductive material, whether for personal
use or compensation; and
(3) "Reproductive material," a human sperm or ovum, or a human organism at any
stage of development from fertilized ovum to embryo.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-22A:
It is a Class 5 felony for a licensed health care provider, in the performance of an
assisted reproduction procedure, to:
(1) Knowingly cause the use of reproductive material from a donor if the patient did
not give written consent to receive the reproductive material from the donor; or
(2) Intentionally cause the use of the licensed health care provider's own reproductive
material without the patient's written consent.
It is not a defense to a violation of this section that the patient consented to an
anonymous donor.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the applicable period of limitation for
prosecution of a violation of this section does not begin to run until the date on which the
violation is discovered and reported to law enforcement or any other governmental
agency.

26.646.10 2 1164
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-22A:
The following individuals may bring a civil action against a licensed health care
provider for performing an assisted reproduction procedure in violation of section 2 of this
Act:
(1) The patient who gives birth to a child as a result of the assisted reproduction
procedure;
(2) The surviving spouse of the patient under subdivision (1);
(3) The intended parent of a child born as a result of the assisted reproduction
procedure;
(4) A child born as a result of the assisted reproduction procedure in violation of section
2 of this Act; and
(5) The donor whose reproductive material was used without the donor's consent or in
a manner inconsistent with the donor's consent.
An individual who brings any action under subdivisions (1) to (4) of this section
has a separate cause of action for each child born as a result of the assisted reproduction
procedure. An individual who brings an action under subdivision (5) of this section has a
separate cause of action for each patient who received an assisted reproduction procedure
using the donor's reproductive material.
An individual who prevails in an action under this section is entitled to liquidated
damages of ten thousand dollars, compensatory and punitive damages, and reasonable
attorney's fees. An individual who prevails in any action brought pursuant to subdivisions
(1) to (4) of this section is also entitled to all costs associated with the assisted
reproduction procedure.
An action may be maintained under this section whether or not the licensed health
care provider alleged to have violated section 2 of this Act is charged or convicted of the
alleged crime.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-22A:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual shall commence a civil
action pursuant to section 3 of this Act no later than five years after:
(1) The eighteenth birthday of the child born as a result of the assisted reproduction
procedure; or
(2) The earliest of the dates on which:
HB1164 ENROLLED

26.646.10 3 1164
(a) The individual first discovers evidence sufficient to bring an action against
the licensed health care provider through deoxyribonucleic acid analysis;
(b) The individual first becomes aware of the existence of a record that provides
evidence sufficient to bring an action against the licensed health care
provider; or
(c) The licensed health care provider admits to the facts giving rise to the
action.
HB1164 ENROLLED

26.646.10 4 1164
An Act to establish the crime of fraudulent assisted reproduction and provide a penalty and
civil liability therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1164
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1164 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1164 ENROLLED